Delaware, session 153, HB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 9903, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating accordingly: Â§ 9903. Duties and authority of the Commission. (j) The Commission shall be responsible for the administration of a Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Program (HCPLRP). The HCPLRP must be administered consistent with all of the following guidelines: (4) The award of health care provider loan repayment grants must be limited to the recruitment and retention of new primary care or dental providers in ambulatory and outpatient settings. For purposes of this paragraph (j)(4), a ânew primary care or dental providerâ means any of the following providers who have completed graduate education within 2 years of the application for a health care provider loan repayment grant being submitted: a. Physicians practicing family medicine (including osteopathic general practice), internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics/ gynecology, geriatrics, and psychiatry. b. Nurse practitioners, certified nurse midwives, clinical nurse specialists, licensed psychologists, licensed professional counselors of mental health, masters of psychology, licensed clinical social workers, and physician assistants practicing adult medicine, family medicine, pediatrics, psychiatry/mental health, geriatrics, and womenâs health. womenâs health, and optometrists. c. Dental clinicians possessing a DDS or DMD and practicing general, pediatric, or public health dentistry. (6) The Commission may award health care loan provider repayment grants to no more than 2 optometrists per year.